Missouri, session 2026, HB2543.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 324.890, to read as follows:
324.890. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Contractor", a person who is employed by a corporation, firm, institution,
organization, or company to perform mechanical work or industrial mechanical
maintenance work;
(2) "Establishment", any legally recognized business entity engaged in
manufacturing;
(3) "Industrial facility", any real property or personal property or fixtures
attached to real property at which an establishment engages in a manufacturing activity
within an area that, if subject to a zoning ordinance or regulation, is zoned for industrial
or similar uses;
(4) "Industrial mechanical maintenance work", maintenance of mechanical
systems or equipment within an industrial facility;
(5) "Local license", a license issued by a political subdivision and valid only in
that political subdivision that is required to bid, accept, or perform mechanical work in
a political subdivision of this state;
(6) "Manufacturing", any activity described in division D of the most recent
version of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2543 2
(7) "State license", a license issued by the state of Missouri that is required to
bid, accept, or perform mechanical work in this state.
2. Any contractor performing industrial mechanical maintenance work
employed at an industrial facility shall not be required to obtain a local license or
state license to perform industrial mechanical maintenance work for the industrial
facility.
✔